Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6179.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-53 of the General Laws entitled "Low and Moderate Income
Housing" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-53-17. Affordable housing stock in Tiverton.
There is hereby established a requirement that the Rhode Island housing authority shall
update the count of affordable housing stock in the town of Tiverton two (2) times per year.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002687
========